Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.556

Sex offender treatment providers—Affiliate sex offender treatment providers—Limited liability—Responsibilities.

(1) A certified sex offender treatment provider, or a certified affiliate sex offender treatment provider who has completed at least fifty percent of the required hours under the supervision of a certified sex offender treatment provider, acting in the course of his or her duties, providing treatment to a person who has been released to a less restrictive alternative under chapter 71.09 RCW or to a level III sex offender on community custody as a court, department, or board ordered condition of sentence is not negligent because he or she treats a high risk offender; sex offenders are known to have a risk of reoffense. The treatment provider is not liable for civil damages resulting from the reoffense of a client unless the treatment provider's acts or omissions constituted gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct. This limited liability provision does not eliminate the treatment provider's duty to warn of and protect from a client's threatened violent behavior if the client communicates a serious threat of physical violence against a reasonably ascertainable victim or victims. In addition to any other requirements to report violations, the sex offender treatment provider is obligated to report an offender's expressions of intent to harm or other predatory behavior, whether or not there is an ascertainable victim, in progress reports and other established processes that enable courts and supervising entities to assess and address the progress and appropriateness of treatment. This limited liability provision applies only to the conduct of certified sex offender treatment providers, and certified affiliate sex offender treatment providers who have completed at least fifty percent of the required hours under the supervision of a certified sex offender treatment provider, and not the conduct of the state.

(2) Sex offender treatment providers who provide services to the department of corrections by identifying risk factors and notifying the department of risks for the subset of high risk offenders who are not amenable to treatment and who are under court order for treatment or supervision are practicing within the scope of their profession.

[ 2008 c 231 s 39; 2004 c 38 s 1; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 403.]

NOTES:

Intent—Application—Application of repealers—Effective date—2008 c 231: See notes following RCW 9.94A.701.

Severability—2008 c 231: See note following RCW 9.94A.500.

Effective date—2004 c 38: See note following RCW 18.155.075.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.